Alabama, session 2026rs, HB478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) This section shall be known as and may
be cited as the "Restroom Access Act."
(b) For the purposes of this section, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) CUSTOMER. An individual who is lawfully on the
premises of a retail establishment.
(2) ELIGIBLE MEDICAL CONDITION. Crohn's disease,
ulcerative colitis, irritable bowel syndrome, or any other
permanent or temporary medical condition that requires
immediate access to a toilet facility.
(3) RETAIL ESTABLISHMENT. A place of business open to
the general public for the sale of goods or services.
(c) A retail establishment that has a toilet facility
for its employees shall allow a customer to use that facility
during normal business hours if all of the following
conditions are met:
(1) The retail establishment does not have a public
restroom that is immediately accessible to the customer.
Page 2

restroom that is immediately accessible to the customer.
HB478 INTRODUCED
(2) The employee toilet facility is not located in an
area where providing access would create an obvious health or
safety risk to the customer or an obvious security risk to the
retail establishment.
(3) The customer requesting the use of the employee
toilet facility suffers from an eligible medical condition,
and the customer provides the retail establishment with
evidence of the customer's eligible medical condition,
including:
a. A copy of a statement signed by a physician,
registered nurse, physician assistant, or a person acting
under the delegation and supervision of a licensed physician,
that indicates the customer suffers from an eligible medical
condition or uses an ostomy device; or
b. An identification card issued by the Crohn's &
Colitis Foundation of America that indicates the customer
suffers from an eligible medical condition or uses an ostomy
device.
(4) Three or more employees of the retail establishment
are working and physically present on the premises of the
retail establishment at the time the customer requests to use
the employee toilet facility.
(d) In providing access to an employee toilet facility
under this section, the retail establishment or employee does
not owe the customer to whom access is provided a greater
degree of care than is owed to a licensee on the premises.
(e) A retail establishment is not required to make any
physical changes to an employee toilet facility under this
Page 3

physical changes to an employee toilet facility under this
HB478 INTRODUCED
section.
(f) An employee of a retail establishment who refuses
to provide a customer with access to an employee toilet
facility as required by this section commits a misdemeanor
punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars
($100).
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4